Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3118
Reciprocal license; conditions.

Notwithstanding section 38-3114, the department may issue a license as a psychologist to any individual who qualifies for such a license pursuant to an agreement of reciprocity entered into by the department, with the recommendation of the board, with the board or boards of another jurisdiction or multiple jurisdictions.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 83;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.21;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1052.